New York, session 2025-2026, A5112.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 4 of chapter 18 of the laws of 2020 authorizing the 2 commissioner of education to appoint a monitor to oversee the Wyandanch 3 union free school district and establishing the powers and duties of the 4 monitor, is amended by adding three new subdivisions 3, 4 and 5 to read 5 as follows: 6 3. In the event that the monitor or monitors find that an adopted 7 resolution or motion, a proposed resolution or motion, or that the 8 board's failure to act violates state law, the rules of the board of 9 regents, the regulations of the commissioner, or is inconsistent with 10 the terms of the long term strategic academic and fiscal improvement 11 plan, the monitor or monitors may: 12 (a) Override adopted or proposed resolutions or motions by the board 13 through the issuance of a directive which shall contain the specific 14 findings as to the necessity of such override and any potential correc- 15 tive action by the board that would address the deficiency in such 16 adopted or proposed resolution or motion. The monitor or monitors shall 17 provide written notice to the board, superintendent and commissioner of 18 their intention to override the adopted or proposed resolution or motion 19 at any time but in no event later than 48 hours after such resolution or 20 motion was adopted by the board unless the commissioner has extended the 21 period to override due to extenuating circumstances that necessitate 22 additional time. The override notice shall stay the proceedings of the 23 board on such adopted resolution or motion or, if the notice is provided EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02772-01-5 A. 5112 2 1 prior to action by the board, it shall remove such proposed resolution 2 or motion from consideration by the board pending the issuance of a 3 directive by the monitor or monitors. The monitor or monitors must 4 submit the directive to the board, superintendent and the commissioner 5 no later than 10 days following notice of such override. Upon the issu- 6 ance of a directive, the override of the board's adopted or proposed 7 resolution or motion shall be final and conclusive unless the monitor or 8 monitors fail to issue such directive within 10 days or within such 9 period established by the monitor or monitors if the period was 10 extended, withdraws such override, or the commissioner overrules the 11 monitor or monitors' override within 10 days of the issuance of the 12 directive. The monitor or monitors may extend the period to submit such 13 directive, at intervals of 10 additional days for each extension, if the 14 board, superintendent or school district employees fail to provide all 15 relevant information requested by the monitor or monitors related to the 16 adopted or proposed resolution or motion subject to such override within 17 48 hours of such request. 18 (b) The resolution shall be submitted to the clerk no later than 48 19 hours prior to the next scheduled board meeting who shall cause the 20 resolution to be placed on the next board meeting agenda and a copy to 21 be issued to the board, superintendent and commissioner accompanied by 22 specific findings as to the necessity of such resolution. The monitor or 23 monitors may direct the board to meet at a date prior to the next sched- 24 uled board meeting to take up such resolution. The monitor or monitors 25 may withdraw the resolution prior to, or during, the next board meeting, 26 if the board takes sufficient action to resolve the issues contained in 27 the resolution. If the resolution is not withdrawn, it shall be deemed 28 to be adopted at the next board meeting through its submission and shall 29 have the full force and effect as any other resolution adopted by the 30 board. 31 (c) The monitor or monitors shall not override an adopted or proposed 32 resolution or motion or submit a resolution related to collective 33 bargaining agreements negotiated in accordance with article 14 of the 34 civil service law. 35 4. The monitor or monitors may direct the board, superintendent, 36 and/or other school district officers to undergo any training as deemed 37 necessary and pursuant to timelines established by the state monitor or 38 monitors. 39 5. The monitor or monitors shall have the power to approve or disap- 40 prove the appointment of a superintendent by the board of education on 41 or after the effective date of this act. The board shall submit the 42 recommendation for superintendent to the monitor or monitors for 43 approval. The monitor or monitors shall have 10 days to approve or 44 disapprove the board's recommendation. If after such period no action is 45 taken by the monitor or monitors, the recommendation for superintendent 46 shall be deemed approved. If the monitor or monitors disapproves of the 47 appointment, then the board shall recommend a new candidate for the 48 monitor or monitors to approve or disapprove until an appointment is 49 approved by the monitor or monitors. In the event that a vacancy occurs 50 in the position of superintendent due to the disapproval of a recommen- 51 dation, the monitor or monitors may appoint a current school employee as 52 interim superintendent until a recommendation for superintendent is 53 approved. 54 § 2. Chapter 18 of the laws of 2020 authorizing the commissioner of 55 education to appoint a monitor to oversee the Wyandanch union free A. 5112 3 1 school district and establishing the powers and duties of the monitor, 2 is amended by adding a new section 7-a to read as follows: 3 § 7-a. Academic improvement plan. 1. No later than November 1, 2025, 4 the board of education and the monitor shall develop an academic 5 improvement plan for the district's 2025--2026 school year and the four 6 subsequent school years. The academic improvement plan shall contain a 7 series of programmatic recommendations designed to improve academic 8 performance over the period of the plan in those academic areas that the 9 commissioner deems to be in need of improvement which shall include 10 addressing the provisions contained in any action plan set forth by the 11 department. 12 2. If the board of education and the monitor agree on all the elements 13 of the proposed academic improvement plan, the board of education shall 14 conduct a public hearing on the plan and consider the input of the 15 community. The proposed academic improvement plan shall be made public 16 on the district's website at least 3 business days before such public 17 hearing. Once the proposed academic improvement plan has been approved 18 by the board of education, such plan shall be submitted by the monitor 19 to the commissioner for approval and shall be deemed approved for the 20 purposes of this act. 21 3. If the board of education and the monitor do not agree on all the 22 elements of the proposed academic improvement plan, the board of educa- 23 tion shall conduct a public hearing on the proposed plan that details 24 the elements of disagreement between the monitor and the board, includ- 25 ing documented justification for such disagreements and any requested 26 amendments from the monitor. The proposed academic improvement plan, 27 elements of disagreement, and requested amendments shall be made public 28 on the district's website at least 3 business days before such public 29 hearing. After considering the input of the community, the board may 30 alter the proposed academic improvement plan and the monitor may alter 31 his or her requested amendments, and the monitor shall submit the 32 proposed academic improvement plan, such monitor's amendments to the 33 plan, and documentation providing justification for such disagreements 34 and amendments to the commissioner no later than December 1, 2025. By 35 January 15, 2026, the commissioner shall approve the proposed plan with 36 any of the monitor's proposed amendments, or make other modifications, 37 such commissioner deems appropriate. The board of education shall 38 provide the commissioner with any information such commissioner requests 39 to approve such plan within 3 business days of such request. Upon the 40 approval of such commissioner, the academic improvement plan shall be 41 deemed approved for purposes of this act. 42 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 43 the amendments to chapter 18 of the laws of 2020 authorizing the commis- 44 sioner of education to appoint a monitor to oversee the Wyandanch union 45 free school district and establishing the powers and duties of the moni- 46 tor, made by sections one and two of this act shall not affect the expi- 47 ration of such chapter and shall expire and be deemed repealed there- 48 with.